New York, session 2025-2026, A7211.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Home- 2 schooled Graduate High School Diploma Act". 3 § 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 4 board of regents of the state of New York is hereby authorized and 5 required to set acceptable standards for the issuance of high school 6 diplomas to students who are homeschooled. The board of regents must 7 insure and shall require that such diplomas are acceptable as proof of 8 completion of an approved course of learning up to the twelfth grade 9 level by all higher education institutions licensed and accredited to 10 operate in the state of New York. All diplomas issued pursuant to this 11 act shall be equivalent in all regards to the generally-accepted high 12 school diploma issued pursuant to the authority of the board of regents. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07460-01-5